Utah statutes.
53-7-222.   Restrictions on the sale or use of fireworks.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), class C dangerous explosives may not be possessed, discharged, sold, or offered for retail sale.

(b) (i)  The following persons may purchase, possess, or discharge class C dangerous explosives:

(A)  display operators and special effects operators who receive a license from the division in accordance with Section 53-7-223 and approval from their local licensing authority in accordance with Section 11-3-3.5; and

(B)  operators approved by the Division of Wildlife Resources or Department of Agriculture and Food to discharge agricultural and wildlife fireworks.

(ii)  Importers and wholesalers licensed under Section 53-7-224 may possess, sell, and offer to sell class C dangerous explosives.

(2)  Unclassified fireworks may not be sold, or offered for sale.



Amended by Chapter 13, 2011 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 13, 2011 General Session, (Coordination Clause)

